Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 16 State Officers
25-16-907. Effective date.

(1)Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this subchapter becomes effective on a board-by-board basis on the date of the board's first regularly scheduled meeting in 1996, and, thereafter, this subchapter shall be the sole authority for expense reimbursement, per diem, and stipends.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, for boards which do not have regularly scheduled meetings, this subchapter becomes effective on a board-by-board basis on the date of the board's first meeting in 1996, and, thereafter, this subchapter shall be the sole authority for expense reimbursement, per diem, and stipends.

Any state board may, by a majority vote of the total membership of the board cast during any meeting in 1995, exercise its powers under this subchapter for calendar year 1995, but, until a board acts or has the opportunity to act in 1996, the law existing on February 1, 1995, as to the board's expense reimbursement and per diem authorization shall apply.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 7.

25-16-908. Distribution of copies.

As soon as possible after April 11, 1995, the Department of Finance and Administration shall provide a copy of this subchapter to every state board which is subject to the provisions hereof.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1211, § 7.

Subchapter 10

— Hiring of Relatives by Public Officials

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-16-1001. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Employee” means a person whose employment is not seasonal or temporary and whose actual performance of duty requires one thousand (1,000) or more hours during a fiscal year;

“Public official” means:

The Secretary of State, Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, Attorney General, Commissioner of State Lands, a member of the Senate, or a member of the House of Representatives; and

The executive head of any agency, department, board, commission, institution, bureau, or council of this state;

“Relative” means a husband, wife, mother, father, stepmother, stepfather, mother-in-law, father-in-law, brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, half-sister, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, daughter, son, stepdaughter, stepson, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, or niece;

“State agency” means:

All boards, commissions, departments, agencies, institutions, state-supported institutions of higher learning, and offices of constitutional officers of the State of Arkansas; and

The General Assembly, including divisions, commissions, and bureaus operating under the authority of the General Assembly; and

“Supervisory employee” means any individual having:

Authority in the interest of the state agency to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees of a state agency; or

The responsibility to direct other employees of a state agency, to adjust their grievances, or to effectively recommend an action if the exercise of authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature but requires the use of independent judgment.

Ark. L. Rev.

Recent Development: Public Officials, 58 Ark. L. Rev. 471.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2262, § 1.

25-16-1002. Prohibited employment of relatives.

A public official shall not appoint, employ, promote, advance, or advocate for appointment, employment, promotion, or advancement in or to a position in the state agency in which the official is serving or over which the official exercises jurisdiction or control, any person who:

Is a relative of the public official; and

Is an employee of a state agency or as a result of the public official's action would be an employee of a state agency.

Within each state agency, no employees who are related shall be placed within the same direct line of supervision whereby one (1) relative is a supervisory employee and responsible for supervising the job performance or work activities of another relative.

If a person is placed on the payroll of a state agency in violation of subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section:

The person shall not be entitled to pay at the rate for which the employee was initially hired;

The person shall be entitled to receive pay at the greater of the minimum hourly wage rate under § 11-4-210 or the federal minimum hourly wage rate under the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq., for time actually worked while in violation of subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section; and

The employment shall be void.

If the Attorney General is suspected of violating this subchapter, the office shall refer the matter to the Pulaski County Prosecuting Attorney.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Office of Personnel Management” in the introductory language of (a).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2262, § 1.

25-16-1003. Married state agency employees.

If as a result of a marriage that occurs after August 12, 2005, employees of a state agency are in violation of the prohibition established by §25-16-1002, the violation shall be resolved by:

Transferring one (1) of the employees to another position within the state agency;

Transferring one (1) of the employees to another state agency; or

The resignation of one (1) of the employees.

(1)The public official of the state agency shall provide written notice to the employees of each of the alternatives under subsection (a) of this section available to eliminate the violation.

The employees shall be given the opportunity to select among the available alternatives.

If the employees are unable to agree upon an alternative within sixty (60) days of the notice required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, then the public official shall take action to eliminate the violation.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2262, § 1.

25-16-1004. Criminal penalty.

A person commits an offense if the person approves an account or draws or authorizes the drawing of a warrant or order to pay the compensation of another person employed in violation of §25-16-1002.

An offense under subsection (a) of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2262, § 1.

25-16-1005. Civil penalties.

A public official who knowingly violates §25-16-1002(a) shall be subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(1)The Attorney General may file suit in Pulaski County Circuit Court to collect the penalty.

Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited to the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2262, § 1.

25-16-1006. Administration and enforcement.

The Office of Personnel Management shall establish rules and forms for all state agencies that will enable each public official and each supervisory employee within a state agency to determine whether:

The hiring of a job applicant would violate §25-16-1002 or §25-16-1003; or

The promotion or transfer of an employee of a state agency would violate §25-16-1003.

The office shall also establish rules concerning the procedures for:

Reporting suspected violations of this subchapter to the office; and

(A)Referring suspected violations to the Attorney General or the Prosecuting Attorney for the Sixth Judicial District for enforcing civil penalties under §25-16-1005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2262, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6304.

25-16-1007. Applicability.

This subchapter shall not apply to the hiring, transfer, or promotion of any person employed in a state agency as of August 12, 2005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2262, § 1.

Subchapter 11

— Forfeiture of or Disqualification from Public Employment on Conviction of an Offense Related to Public Employment

25-16-1101. Legislative intent.

It is the policy of the State of Arkansas to promote integrity in public employment.

It is the intent of this subchapter to require that a public servant who pleads guilty to or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of the following to forfeit his or her office, position, or employment, and thereafter he or she is disqualified from holding an office, position, or employment with a governmental body:

A felony offense relating to his or her office, position, or employment;

A misdemeanor offense involving fraud, dishonesty, bribery, forgery, or other form of corruption relating to his or her office, position, or employment; or

Theft of property under § 5-36-103 when the victim of the theft is the governmental body with which the public servant is associated.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the following” for “any felony offense relating to his or her office, position, or employment” in (b); and added (b)(1) through (b)(3).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 679, § 1; 2013, No. 995, § 1.

25-16-1102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Governmental body” means any office, department, commission, council, board, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state, municipality, county, school district, institution of higher education, improvement district, or any political district or subdivision;

“Offense” means conduct for which a sentence to a term of imprisonment or fine, or both, is authorized by statute;

“Public servant” means a public official, public employee, or public appointee.

“Public servant” does not mean a member of the General Assembly or a person holding an office of trust or profit in the state under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 9;

“Relating to” means an offense that directly involves a person's performance in the office, position, or employment held by a person in a governmental body; and

“Public official” means a member of the General Assembly or person holding an office of trust or profit in the state under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 9.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added the (3)(A) designation; and added (3)(B) and (5).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 679, § 1; 2013, No. 995, §§ 2, 3.

25-16-1103. Forfeiture of office.

A public servant holding an office, position, or employment in a governmental body shall forfeit the office, position, or employment if he or she pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of:

A felony offense relating to the public servant's office, position, or employment;

A misdemeanor offense involving fraud, dishonesty, bribery, forgery, or other form of corruption relating to the public servant's office, position, or employment; or

Theft of property under § 5-36-103 when the victim of the theft is the governmental body with which the public servant is associated.

A public official may be removed from office under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5.

The General Assembly or the state may consider the following offenses when determining if a public official is qualified:

A felony offense;

Theft of property under § 5-36-103;

Abuse of office under § 5-52-107; or

Witness tampering under § 5-53-110.

A public official or public servant may hold a public office after he or she is removed from an office, position, or employment with a governing body if an offense identified in subdivision (b)(2) of this section is expunged and permitted under applicable law.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment in (a) deleted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” and added (a)(1) through (a)(3), rewrote (b), and added (c).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 679, § 1; 2013, No. 995, § 4.

25-16-1104. Disqualification from office.

A public servant who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of an offense under §25-16-1103(a) shall be disqualified and barred from holding an office, position, or employment in a governmental body.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 679, § 1; 2013, No. 995, § 5.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “public servant” for “person” and substituted “an offense under §25-16-1103(a)” for “a felony offense relating to his or her office, position, or employment in a governmental body.”

25-16-1105. Enforcement.

Forfeiture of an office, position, or employment may be raised at the time a public servant pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of an offense under § 25-16-1103(a).

If the issue of forfeiture is raised against a public servant, the circuit court shall order the public servant to pay a penalty.

The circuit court shall determine the amount of the penalty under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section by considering the following:

The length of time over which the offense occurred;

The amount of money the offense cost the governmental body;

The amount of the public servant's salary during the time period in which the offense occurred;

The severity of the public servant's breach of public trust; and

Any other information the court considers relevant.

A penalty paid under subdivision (a)(2) of this section is in addition to an award to the state for restitution and the sentence of the public servant.

If the issue of forfeiture is raised against a public servant, following sentencing a circuit court shall order forfeiture of an office, position, or employment upon a finding that § 25-16-1103 applies to the public servant.

If the issue of forfeiture is not raised under subsection (a) of this section, an action may be brought to remove the public servant in the manner provided by law to prevent usurpation of office under § 16-118-105.

If a public servant is removed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the circuit court shall order the public servant to pay a penalty to the state.

The circuit court shall determine the amount of the penalty under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section by considering the factors under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section.

A penalty paid under this subdivision (b)(2) is in addition to an award to the state for restitution and the sentence of the public servant.

A public official who is removed from office under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 9, may be ordered to pay a penalty if he or she pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of one (1) of the following offenses:

A felony offense;

Theft of property under § 5-36-103;

Abuse of office under § 5-52-107; or

Witness tampering under § 5-53-110.

The circuit court shall determine the amount of the penalty under subdivision (c)(1) of this section by considering the factors under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section.

A penalty paid under subdivision (c)(1) of this section is in addition to an award to the state for restitution and the sentence of the public official.

If a person holding an office, position, or employment in a governmental body is disqualified from the office, position, or employment under § 25-16-1104, an action may be brought to remove the person in the manner provided by law to prevent usurpation of office under § 16-118-105.

This section does not prohibit a taxpayer from bringing a civil action under Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 13.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “an offense under §25-16-1103(a)” for “a felony offense relating to his or her office, position, or employment in a governmental body” in (a)(1); added (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(3); inserted the (b)(1) designation; added (b)(2) and (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 679, § 1; 2013, No. 995, § 6.

25-16-1106. Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to a public servant that, on or after July 31, 2009, pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of a felony offense relating to his or her office, position, or employment in any governmental body.

This subchapter shall not supersede any provision of Arkansas law which provides forfeiture of or disqualification from service as a public servant for an offense other than a felony.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 679, § 1.

25-16-1107. Effect of expungement.

An expunged record shall not serve as the basis for forfeiture of office or disqualification from office under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 679, § 1.

25-16-102. [Repealed.]

25-16-203. Reports to Governor — Inclusion in message to General Assembly.

Subchapter 3

— Lieutenant Governor

25-16-405. Arkansas Ambassador's Certificate.

25-16-515. Accounting at expiration of term of appropriation.

25-16-611. Quarterly report on notes and on moneys from sale of state lands.

25-16-711. Disputes between Attorney General and a constitutional officer.

25-16-803. Terms not to expire between biennial general election and Governor's swearing in.